Washington statutes.
RCW 10.66.005

Findings.

The legislature finds that drug abuse is escalating at an alarming rate. New protections need to be established to address this drug crisis which is threatening every stratum of our society. Prohibiting known drug traffickers from frequenting areas for continuous drug activity is one means of addressing this pervasive problem.

[ 1989 c 271 s 213.]